Utah statutes.
73-10-22.   Water Resources Cities Water Loan Fund -- Annual appropriation
-- Interest.
(1)  Beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30, 1978, the Legislature
shall provide an annual appropriation from the General Fund from liquor
control profits to the Board of Water Resources to make the loans provided for
in Sections 73-10-20, 73-10-21, and 73-10-23.  The  money appropriated by the
Legislature shall be deposited in a fund known as the Water Resources Cities
Water Loan Fund.
(2)  All  money deposited into the Water Resources Cities Water Loan Fund
shall be invested by the state treasurer with interest accruing to the Water
Resources Cities Water Loan Fund.
